Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 7

Release Privileges

41-21-701. Roster of inmate release privileges.

The department of correction shall compile and maintain a record that shall be known as the roster of inmate release privileges.

The roster shall be divided into two (2) parts, to be designated as Part I and Part II.

The roster shall be kept in the department's central office and shall be available for public inspection during regular office hours.

A photostatic copy of the most recently published roster shall be provided to the legislative library of the office of legal services for the general assembly.

Acts 1978, ch. 873, § 1; 1980, ch. 721, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2501; T.C.A., § 41-25-101.

Cross-References. Community work projects for probationers, title 41, ch. 9.

Work release programs, litter removal, § 41-2-149.

41-21-702. Contents of Part I of roster.

Part I of the roster shall be divided into the following sections:

Trusties;

Work release;

Educational release;

Restitutional release;

Prerelease;

Furloughs; and

Paroles.

Part I shall also contain an individual section for any other program whereby an inmate may receive the privilege of supervised or unsupervised release into the community.

The following information shall be provided in Part I for each inmate listed in Part I:

The crime or crimes for which the inmate is incarcerated;

The date or dates of conviction;

The sentence or sentences imposed;

Time served;

The effective dates of the privilege;

The inmate's security classification;

The department facility, if applicable, where the inmate will be housed while the privilege is in effect; and

Any governmental entity sharing responsibility for the inmate's supervision while the privilege is in effect.

The department is authorized to include such additional information as it determines is needed for clarification or justification of an inmate's participation.

Acts 1978, ch. 873, §§ 4, 6; 1980, ch. 721, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A., § 41-2502; T.C.A. § 41-25-102.

Cross-References. Furlough program, §§ 41-2-142, 41-2-143.

Furloughs granted to inmates, § 41-21-227.

Inmate rehabilitation, work release programs, § 41-21-510 — 41-21-516.

Notice to police of release of convict, § 41-21-224.

Paroles, title 40, ch. 28, parts 1 and 4.

Registration of parolees upon release, § 41-21-225.

Release of prisoners for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes, §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132.

Restitution centers, title 41, ch. 6.

Work outside prisons, § 41-21-208.

Work release program for counties with consolidated or metropolitan government, §§ 41-2-133 — 41-2-142.

41-21-703. Contents of Part II of roster — Reporting guidelines.

Part II of the roster shall be divided into sections. Each state-operated correctional institution that houses inmates who participate in the work release, restitution release or educational release program shall comprise one (1) section. Each section shall provide the following information relative to participants in the work release, restitutional release, educational release, inmate staff and prerelease programs:

The name of each inmate who was guilty of an unexcused absence or escape;

The period of the absence or escape or the fact that the inmate is at large; and

The disciplinary action taken relative to the absence or escape;

The name of each inmate who was guilty of a departmental or institutional rule violation other than unexcused absence or escape;

A general statement identifying the nature of the rule so violated; and

The disciplinary action taken relative to the violation;

The name of each inmate who was arrested for or charged with a criminal offense allegedly committed while participating in the work release, restitutional release, educational release, inmate staff or prerelease program;

A general statement identifying the nature of the crime allegedly committed; and

The status of the prosecution of the inmate; and

The name of each inmate who was voluntarily or involuntarily sent to another correctional institution for any reason other than release from incarceration; and

A general statement identifying the reason for the ejection.

The department is authorized to include any additional information as it determines is needed for clarification or for justification of a relevant departmental action.

The commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee shall promulgate such guidelines as may be necessary to ensure that the institutions affected by this section compile and report the information required by this section in an efficient, thorough, and uniform manner.

Acts 1980, ch. 721, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-25-103.

41-21-704. Publication — Effective periods.

A new roster shall be published each month.

The effective period of Part I shall be and include the month in which the list is published. Part I shall identify all inmates who will participate under any one (1) or more release programs during the effective period of Part I.

The effective period of Part II shall include and be the second month preceding publication. Part II shall report all information required by § 41-21-703 that occurred during the effective period of Part II.

Acts 1978, ch. 873, § 3; 1980, ch. 721, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 41-2503, 41-25-104.

41-21-705. Advance notice of furloughs not required.

The advance notice prerequisite as required by § 41-21-704 shall not apply to furloughs granted under the authority of § 41-21-227; however, the issuance of those furloughs shall be indicated on the roster published immediately following issuance of the furloughs.

Acts 1978, ch. 873, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 41-2505, 41-25-105.